Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-7014
Tax credit; distribution.

Any tax credit allowable to a partnership, a limited liability company, a subchapter S corporation, a cooperative corporation, or an estate or trust may be distributed to the partners, limited liability company members, shareholders, cooperative members, or beneficiaries in the same manner as income is distributed.

Laws 2023, LB727, § 6.